fr: Tamponnage du substrat: À tampon; Partiellement tamponné; Sans tampon; Autre
en: Growing media buffering: Buffered; Partially buffered; Unbuffered; Other
ko: 재배 배지 버퍼 처리 여부: 버퍼드; 부분 버퍼링; 언버퍼드; 기타
cs: Pufrování pěstebního média: Pufrováno; Částečně pufrováno; Nepufrováno; Jiné
fi: Kasvualustan puskurointikyky: Puskuroitu; Osittain puskuroitu; Puskuroimaton; Muu
pt-BR: Tampão do meio de cultura: Tamponado; Parcialmente tamponado; Sem buffer; Outro
zh-CN: 生长介质缓冲能力: 缓冲型; 部分缓冲; 非缓冲型; 其他
th: การปรับสภาพความเป็นกรดด่างของวัสดุปลูก: บัฟเฟอร์; ปรับสภาพบางส่วนแล้ว; ไม่มีบัฟเฟอร์; อื่นๆ
es: Amortiguamiento del sustrato: Amortiguador; Parcialmente amortiguado; Sin almacenar; Otros
nb: Vekstmedium-forbehandling: Bufret; Delvis bufret; Ubuffret; Annet
da: Justering af vækstmedium: Buffered; Delvist buffered; Unbuffered; Andet
pt-PT: Tamponamento do meio de cultivo: Armazenamento em buffer; Parcialmente tamponado; Sem buffer; Outro
bg-BG: Буфериране на растежна среда: Буферирано; Частично буферирано; Небуферирано; Друго
hr-HR: Puferiranje medija za uzgoj: Puferirano; Djelomično puferirano; Bez međuspremnika; Ostalo
tr: Yetiştirme ortamı tamponlama durumu: Tamponlanmış; Kısmen tamponlanmış; Tamponsuz; Diğer
ru: Буферизация субстрата: Буферизированный; С частичной буферизацией; Небуферизированный; Другой
el: Ρύθμιση pH υποστρώματος καλλιέργειας: Ρυθμισμένο; Μερικώς ρυθμισμένο; Μη ρυθμισμένο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 栽培介質緩衝處理: 有緩衝; 部分緩衝; 無緩衝; 其他
sv: Växtmediums buffring: Buffrad; Delvis buffrad; Obuffrad; Övrigt
sk-SK: Úprava substrátu: S buferom; Čiastočne pufrované; Bez buferu; Iné
lt-LT: Auginimo terpės buferinė apdorojimo būsena: Buferinis; Iš dalies buferizuota; Nebuferinis; Kita
pl: Buforowanie podłoża: Buforowane; Częściowo buforowane; Niebuforowane; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Obdelava rastnega substrata za uravnavanje soli: Blažilno; Delno shranjeno v medpomnilniku; Brez medpomnjenja; Druga
nl: Buffering van groeimedium: Gebufferd; Gedeeltelijk gebufferd; Niet-gebufferd; Overig
it: Buffering dei substrati di coltura: Buffered; Parzialmente tamponato; Unbuffered; Altro
ja: 成育媒体の緩衝処理: バッファあり; 部分的バッファリング; バッファなし; その他
hu: Növekedési közeg pufferelése: Pufferelt; Részben pufferelt; Puffermentes; Egyéb
vi: Xử lý đệm giá thể trồng: Có đệm; Có đệm một phần; Chưa ghi vào bộ nhớ đệm; Khác
de: Pufferung des Wachstumsmediums: Gepuffert; Teilweise gepuffert; Ungepuffert; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tratarea fibrelor de cocos: Tamponat; Parțial tamponat; Fără tampon; Altele